Utah statutes.
59-1-1402.1.   Exceptions to applicability of this part.

This part does not apply to:

(1)  Chapter 2, Property Tax Act;

(2)  Chapter 3, Tax Equivalent Property Act; or

(3)  Chapter 4, Privilege Tax.



Enacted by Chapter 52, 2011 General Session

